Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1 General Provisions
38-8-115. Safe Neighborhoods Act of 1998.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe Neighborhoods Act of 1998.”

By October 1, 1998, the department of finance and administration shall establish within the department a program to award state law enforcement assistance grants to local governmental agencies from money appropriated by the general appropriations act. The exclusive purpose of the grants is to assist local governments in meeting the local funding requirement necessary to receive a grant under the federal Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994 for a portion of the costs associated with the employment of new law enforcement officers by local government.

The department is authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules necessary to establish and administer the grant program; provided, that no such rule or departmental policy shall be promulgated or interpreted contrary to the following guidelines:

All state grants to local governmental agencies shall be awarded only upon the basis of merit as determined by the department in accordance with selection criteria established by rule and regulation pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. Local governmental agencies wishing to participate in the grant program shall submit an application to the department as prescribed by rule and regulation;

The number of state grants awarded in a fiscal year is dependent on the amount of money appropriated for the grants and the number of qualified and conforming grant applications. Nothing in this subdivision (c)(2) shall be construed to mean that all money appropriated during a fiscal year for state grants must be awarded during that year if there are an insufficient number of qualified and conforming applications;

No state grant shall exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount of the grant the local government has been approved to receive from the federal government;

In order to receive a state grant pursuant to this section for the federal local funding requirement, the local governmental entity must have been approved for a universal hiring program grant under the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994 that is for the exclusive purpose of providing financial assistance for the employment of additional law enforcement officers in that locality; and

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit the awarding of a state grant to assist in hiring school resource officers that have been approved for a federal universal hiring program grant.

Acts 1998, ch. 1030, § 1; 1999, ch. 129, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994, referred to in this section, was enacted on September 13, 1994, as 103 P.L. 322.

38-8-116.
Law enforcement shooting ranges — Methods for retired law enforcement officer to meet annual requirements to carry firearm shipped or transported in interstate or foreign commerce — Maintenance of a list of approved certified firearms instructors.

All law enforcement agencies are allowed to open their shooting ranges for public use when such ranges are not being used by law enforcement personnel. The law enforcement agency in charge of a shooting range may establish reasonable regulations for the use of the firing range in order to promote the full use of the range without interfering with the needs of law enforcement personnel. The law enforcement agency may also charge a reasonable fee for persons or organizations using the range and may require users to make improvements to the range.

A law enforcement officer acting as an individual and not as an employee, agent or on behalf of any governmental entity who has retired in good standing, as determined solely by the chief law enforcement officer of the retired officer's law enforcement agency, may utilize any one (1) of the following methods to meet the annual requirements to carry a firearm that has been shipped or transported in interstate or foreign commerce in the same manner and to the same extent as authorized for an active law enforcement officer to carry a firearm of the same type:

Obtaining a photographic identification issued by the agency from which the individual retired from service as a law enforcement officer that indicates that the individual has, not less recently than one (1) year before the date the individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise found by the agency to meet the standards established by the agency for training and qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the concealed firearm;

Meeting the standards established by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training (POST) commission for qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type by qualifying at and obtaining such an annual certification directly from the Tennessee POST commission; or

Upon payment of any customary associated fees, utilize a private shooting range and engage the services of a certified firearms instructor to provide the training and verify that the retired law enforcement officer has met the standards established by the Tennessee POST commission for qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type. The certified firearms instructor is authorized to issue a certificate indicating that the retired law enforcement officer has met the applicable standards.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “retired law enforcement officer” means a retired law enforcement officer, as described in subsection (b), or a retired correctional officer previously employed by the department of correction or a retired inmate relations coordinator previously employed by the department of correction.

A retired law enforcement officer may become certified to carry a firearm within this state that has been shipped or transported in interstate or foreign commerce in the same manner and to the same extent as authorized for an active law enforcement officer.

To become certified pursuant to this subsection (c) for the first time, a retired officer may utilize any of the methods set out in subsection (b) to meet the standards established by the Tennessee POST commission for qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type.

To complete the criminal history background check requirement for certification, a retired officer shall go to the sheriff in the county where the officer resides to have fingerprints taken. The officer shall be required to present photo identification at the time the fingerprints are taken. If the presented photo identification does not accurately identify the officer, then the sheriff shall refuse to take the officer's fingerprints. The sheriff may charge a fee not to exceed six dollars ($6.00) for taking the officer's fingerprints and sending two (2) copies of the same to the Tennessee POST commission.

At the time an officer submits an application to be filed with the Tennessee POST commission, the officer shall present photo identification; if the name on the photo identification and the name on the application are not the same, the Tennessee POST commission shall refuse to accept the application. If the person whose picture appears on the photo identification is not the same as the officer, the Tennessee POST commission shall refuse to accept the application.

Upon receipt of the two (2) copies of an officer's fingerprints from a county sheriff's office, the Tennessee POST commission shall send the fingerprints of the officer and the application filed by the officer to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI).

Upon receipt of the fingerprints from the Tennessee POST commission, the TBI shall:

Within thirty (30) days from receipt of the fingerprints, conduct computer searches to determine the officer's eligibility for a permit under subsection (c) as are available to the bureau based solely upon the applicant's name, date of birth and social security number and send the results of the searches to the Tennessee POST commission;

Conduct a criminal history record check based upon one (1) set of the fingerprints received and send the results to the Tennessee POST commission; and

Send one (1) set of the fingerprints received from the Tennessee POST commission to the federal bureau of investigation (FBI), request a federal criminal history record check based upon the fingerprints, as long as the service is available, and send the results of the check to the Tennessee POST commission.

The Tennessee POST commission shall deny a permit application if it determines from information contained in the criminal history record checks conducted by the TBI and FBI pursuant to subdivision (c)(5), or from other information, that the applicant:

Is prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm in this state pursuant to § 39-17-1316, § 39-17-1307(b) or (c), 18 U.S.C. § 922(g), or any other state or federal law, or is prohibited from obtaining a handgun carry permit pursuant to § 39-17-1351 or § 39-17-1366; or

Has been convicted of the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant in this or any other state two (2) or more times within ten (10) years from the date of the application and at least one (1) of the convictions has occurred within five (5) years from the date of application or renewal.

The Tennessee POST commission shall not be required to confirm the officer's eligibility for certification beyond the information received from the TBI and FBI, if any.

Certification of a retired officer under this section shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from the date the Tennessee POST commission issues the officer's certification under this subsection (c).

For a retired officer to recertify under this subsection (c) upon the expiration of the initial certification, the officer shall only be required to undergo the criminal history background check portion of the certification process. No fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the officer's initial certification under this subsection (c), the officer shall undergo a criminal history background check in accordance with the procedure set out in subdivisions (c)(3)-(5).

Because the certification requirements of this subsection (c) do not meet the requirements of 18 U.S.C. § 926C(d), a retired officer certified under this subsection (c) is not permitted to carry a firearm outside this state unless otherwise authorized to do so with a handgun carry permit issued pursuant to § 39-17-1351.

If the provisions of 18 U.S.C. § 926C(d), or any other provision of federal law change to permit an officer certified under this section to carry a firearm outside this state, such officer shall be permitted to carry a firearm as permitted by federal law.

The Tennessee POST commission shall maintain a list of approved certified firearms instructors, which may include any instructor utilized by a person to receive a handgun carry permit under § 39-17-1351, that it considers qualified to train and verify that a retired law enforcement officer has met the standards established by the Tennessee POST commission for qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type.

A retired officer may bring the certificate issued by the certified firearms instructor pursuant to subdivision (b)(3) to the Tennessee POST commission. If the certificate was issued by an instructor who is on the POST commission's approved list and the commission determines, in the manner prescribed in § 38-8-123, that the applicant is eligible to carry a firearm under federal law, the commission shall issue the officer a certification that the officer has met the standards established by the Tennessee POST commission for qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type. A certificate so issued by the Tennessee POST commission shall be considered a certification issued by the state for purposes of 18 U.S.C. § 926C(d)(2)(B). A certificate issued to a retired officer pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be automatically revoked by operation of law upon the officer becoming ineligible to carry a firearm under federal law.

The Tennessee POST commission is authorized to establish and charge a fee for issuing a certification under this section.

If a retired law enforcement officer who has been certified to carry a firearm pursuant to this section is arrested and charged with a violation of § 55-10-401 and the officer has one (1) or more prior convictions for the same offense within the last ten (10) years, then the court first having jurisdiction over the officer with respect to the charge shall order the officer to surrender the certificate and send the certificate to the certifying agency with a copy of the court's order that required the surrender of the certificate, unless the officer petitions the court for a hearing on the surrender.

If the officer does petition the court for a hearing, the court shall determine whether the officer will present a material risk of physical harm to the public if released and allowed to retain the certificate. If the court determines that the officer will present a material risk of physical harm to the public, it shall condition the release of the officer, whether on bond or otherwise, upon the officer's surrender of the certificate to the court. The certifying agency shall suspend the certificate pending a final disposition on the charge against the officer.

If the officer is not convicted of the charge or charges, the certificate shall be restored and returned to the officer and the temporary prohibition against the carrying of a firearm as a law enforcement officer shall be lifted.

If the officer is convicted of the charge or charges, the certificate shall be revoked by the court and the revocation shall be noted in the judgment and minutes of the court. The court shall send the surrendered certificate to the issuing agency.

Acts 2004, ch. 865, § 1; 2009, ch. 430, § 1; 2011, ch. 363, § 1; 2011, ch. 413, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 783, § 1; 2016, ch. 1054, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 479, § 14.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (c)(6), redesignated and amended the former first sentence as the present introductory language of (A) by substituting “or from other information, that the applicant:” for “or from other information that comes to the attention of the Tennessee POST commission, that the officer does not meet the eligibility to carry a firearm under this section”, added (A)(i) and (A)(ii), and redesignated the former second sentence as present (B); and added (g).

The 2019 amendment effective January 1, 2020, substituted “§ 39-17-1351 or § 39-17-1366” for “§ 39-17-1351” at the end of (c)(6)(A)(i).

Effective Dates. Act 2016, ch. 1054, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Act 2019, ch. 479, § 22. January 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Noise control at sport shooting ranges, § 39-17-316.

Attorney General Opinions. The Peace Officer Standards & Training (POST) Commission has authority to impose a fee for both statewide and nationwide certification and, in its discretion, to determine a reasonable fee for the issuance of firearm certifications. The Commission may also establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to administer its duties. OAG 18-44, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (9/18/2018).

38-8-117. Training in animal and canine behavior.

The course of training leading to the basic certificate of compliance issued by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission pursuant to § 38-8-107, may include a course of instruction in animal behavior generally and canine behavior specifically.

The course shall be created and designed to instruct officer candidates in:

Basic animal behavioral characteristics, traits and methods by which an officer can ascertain whether an animal is likely to be or become aggressive and thereby constitute a threat to the officer or other people;

Situations and environments in which an animal is more likely to be or become aggressive and methods by which the officer can control or alter these situations or environments in order to best protect the officer and other people; and

Ways in which a law enforcement officer can control and neutralize an animal that is or becomes aggressive in a manner that utilizes the least amount of force or likelihood of harm to the animal necessary to protect the officer and other people.

For law enforcement officers who have completed the animal behavior training course required by subsections (a) and (d) of this section, any annual in-service training, necessary for the salary supplement authorized in § 38-8-111, may also include the animal behavior training course.

The annual in-service training course shall also include any updates or instructional or educational advancements that become available in this area.

Every officer who was employed prior to the time when the course of instruction was established and offered may be required to complete it as part of the officer's annual in-service training.

Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “General Patton Act of 2003.”

Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 8 provided that the provisions of this act shall not apply to any animal while that animal is being used for training, for an occupational purpose, or for hunting.

38-8-118. Employment of private special deputies for security and law enforcement.

A resort area owner or management company may employ one (1) or more persons to act as private special deputies, in order to provide on-site security and law enforcement capability for residents and guests of the resort area and for resort area property.

An independent contractor who provides on-site security and law enforcement capability for federal government property that is an air force base and home to a development center that is the most advanced and largest complex of flight simulation test facilities in the world may employ one (1) or more persons to act as private special deputies for such purposes.

Upon employing a person for security and law enforcement purposes, the resort area shall seek appointment of the person as a private special deputy by the sheriff of the county where the resort is located, in accordance with § 8-8-212.

Upon employing a person for security and law enforcement purposes pursuant to subdivision (a)(2), the independent contractor shall seek appointment of the person as a private special deputy by the sheriff of the county where the government property is located, in accordance with § 8-8-212.

No person may serve as a private special deputy, unless the person proves financial responsibility, to the appointing sheriff, as evidenced by a corporate surety bond in no less amount than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by a liability insurance policy of the employer in no less amount than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

The sheriff shall appoint the person as a private special deputy, if the person seeking appointment demonstrates to the sheriff that the person:

Meets all of the qualifications for a police officer set out in § 38-8-106;

Proves financial responsibility as provided in subdivision (b)(2); and

Has received training or continuing training, from whatever source, that is equivalent to or superior to the training or continuing training required for a law enforcement officer under the standards established by the peace officer standards and training commission for law enforcement officers.

When properly appointed by the appropriate sheriff, the private special deputy shall be authorized to act independently of other law enforcement agencies and shall have all the police powers necessary to enforce all state laws, as well as rules and regulations of the resort area. The authority granted extends to all facilities or property owned, leased or operated by the employing resort, including any public roads or rights-of-way that are contiguous to, within the perimeter of, or connect between the facilities, property, or interests of a particular institution.

The authority granted to private special deputies pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(B) extends to all facilities or property over which the independent contractor employing such deputies has been given authority by the employing governmental entity to provide on-site security and law enforcement services, including any public roads or rights-of-way that are contiguous to, within the perimeter of, or connect between the facilities, property or interests of the governmental property.

Anyone incurring any wrong, injury, loss, damage, or expense resulting from any act or failure to act on the part of any private special deputy appointed by the sheriff, but not employed by the sheriff or the county, shall not bring suit against the sheriff or the county, and the sheriff and county shall be immune from such suits, and the plaintiff shall be required to pursue the remedy against the private special deputy and/or the employer or employers of the private special deputy, whether the private special deputy is acting within the scope of employment or not.

Notwithstanding this subsection (d), § 8-8-303 or any other law to the contrary, the governmental immunity of the county in which a sheriff has appointed a private special deputy or deputies is not waived for any wrong, injury, loss, damage or expense resulting from an act or omission of the private special deputy under the following circumstances:

The sheriff's department of the county has entered into a mutual assistance agreement with the resort area owner or management company or with the independent contractor providing on-site security and law enforcement capability for federal government property described in subdivision (a)(2) that employs the private special deputy or deputies;

The act or omission occurred while the private special deputy was involved in official law enforcement duties after having been dispatched by the sheriff to respond to a call, provide backup or otherwise assist the sheriff's department in a law enforcement capacity or at the scene of an accident, crime or other incident; and

The crime or incident to which the private special deputy was dispatched was outside the boundaries of the governmental property described in subdivision (a)(2) or resort area, as established in subsection (c).

This section shall not entitle any private special deputy to any public funding, for training or otherwise.

Acts 2006, ch. 862, § 2; 2009, ch. 284, §§ 1-5.

38-8-119. Training to respond to mentally ill persons.

All police officers shall annually be provided with training in proper procedures to respond to persons with mental illnesses.

Acts 2007, ch. 259, § 3; 2011, ch. 106, § 1.

Cross-References. Emergency detention of mentally ill persons, §§ 33-6-401, 33-6-402.

38-8-120. School policing.

A memorandum of understanding may be entered into between a chief of a law enforcement agency and a local education agency to provide school policing.

Acts 2007, ch. 341, § 3.

38-8-121. Substitution of training in school policing for continuing education hours.

A law enforcement officer may substitute a maximum of forty (40) hours of successfully completed training in school policing for regular continuing education hours.

Acts 2007, ch. 341, § 4.

Cross-References. Training to respond to mentally ill persons, § 38-8-119.

38-8-122. Substitution of training in courthouse security for continuing education hours.

A law enforcement officer may substitute a maximum of forty (40) hours of successfully completed training in courthouse security for regular continuing education hours.

Acts 2008, ch. 1152, § 2.

38-8-123. Determination of eligibility of retired officer to carry a firearm under federal law.

The Tennessee POST commission shall determine a retired officer's eligibility to carry a firearm under federal law as provided in this section.

In addition to the identification or certificate required by § 38-8-116(d), the applicant shall be required to submit an application and two (2) full sets of classifiable fingerprints to the Tennessee POST commission. The applicant shall present photo identification at the time the application is submitted to the Tennessee POST commission. The commission shall not accept the application and fingerprints submitted by the applicant unless the photo identification presented accurately identifies the applicant and the name on the photo identification, the name on the application, and, if the applicant's fingerprints were taken by a sheriff as provided in subdivision (b)(2), the name on the fingerprint card, are the same.

The applicant's fingerprints may be taken by the Tennessee POST commission at the time the application is submitted or the applicant may have the fingerprints taken at any sheriff's office. If the applicant's fingerprints are taken by a sheriff, then the applicant shall be required to present photo identification at the time the fingerprints are taken. If the presented photo identification does not accurately identify the applicant, then the sheriff shall refuse to take the applicant's fingerprints. The sheriff may charge a fee not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) for taking the applicant's fingerprints.

Upon receipt of an applicant's permit application and fingerprints, the Tennessee POST commission shall forward both sets of fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI).

Upon receipt of the fingerprints from the Tennessee POST commission, the TBI shall:

Within thirty (30) days from receipt of the fingerprints conduct:

Any computer search available to the bureau based solely upon the applicant's name, date of birth and social security number to determine the applicant's eligibility for a permit under subsection (a) and send the results of the searches to the Tennessee POST commission;

A criminal history record check based upon one (1) set of the fingerprints received and send the results to the Tennessee POST commission; and

Within fifteen (15) days, send one (1) set of the fingerprints received to the federal bureau of investigation (FBI). The TBI shall request that the FBI conduct a federal criminal history record check based upon the fingerprints, as long as the service is available, and send the results of the check to the Tennessee POST commission.

The Tennessee POST commission shall deny a permit application if it determines from information contained in the criminal history record checks conducted by the TBI and FBI pursuant to subdivision (c)(2), or from other information that comes to the attention of the Tennessee POST commission, that the applicant is not eligible to carry a firearm under federal law. The Tennessee POST commission shall not be required to confirm the applicant's eligibility for certification beyond the information received from the TBI and FBI, if any.

If the Tennessee POST commission denies an application, then the Tennessee POST commission shall notify the applicant in writing within ten (10) days of the denial. The written notice shall state the specific factual basis for the denial. It shall include a copy of any reports, records or inquiries reviewed or relied upon by the Tennessee POST commission.

Acts 2011, ch. 413, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. The Peace Officer Standards & Training (POST) Commission has authority to impose a fee for both statewide and nationwide certification and, in its discretion, to determine a reasonable fee for the issuance of firearm certifications. The Commission may also establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to administer its duties. OAG 18-44, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (9/18/2018).

38-8-124. Providing false information to POST.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, where an applicant for POST certification knowingly includes false or misleading information on an application concerning the applicant's qualifications, experience, training or criminal history, the applicant shall be denied POST certification in this state and shall not be eligible to reapply.

Where a POST certified officer obtains POST certification by knowingly providing false or misleading information concerning the officer's qualifications, experience, training or criminal history, POST shall decertify the officer.

Any officer decertified by POST under subdivision (b)(1) shall be removed from office and shall not be eligible to apply for a law enforcement position.

For purposes of this section, “law enforcement position” means:

A state or local employee who exercises law enforcement authority, including, but not limited to, a position with the:

Tennessee wildlife resources agency;

Tennessee public utility commission;

Division of forestry; or

Alcoholic beverage commission;

A state or local employee exercising quasi-law enforcement authority, including, but not limited to, correctional employees and jailers; or

Any support position to an entity or employee under subdivision (c)(1) or (c)(2).

Acts 2012, ch. 858, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 82.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment in (c)(1)(B) substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

38-8-125. Government participation in certain voluntary motor vehicle checkpoints and stops prohibited.

“Human sample” means a cheek swab, blood or urine sample, saliva, hair or any other bodily fluid or exemplar from which the DNA of the donor may be derived and identified and for which a law enforcement officer would be required to seek a search warrant to obtain such sample.

No state, county, municipal or metropolitan form of government law enforcement officer shall participate in, lend assistance to, or be present in any official capacity at any voluntary motor vehicle checkpoint or stop conducted by a private company or research group to collect a human sample from consenting motorists stopped at the checkpoint for research or statistical purposes.

Subsection (b) is applicable regardless of whether the checkpoint is funded by federal grant or contract with a federal agency and regardless of whether the motorists consenting to giving a human sample are compensated or not.

Acts 2014, ch. 578, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 578, § 2. March 28, 2014.

38-8-126. Arrest of officer — Notification requirements — Suspension or revocation.

An officer certified under this part who is arrested for any offense shall notify the executive secretary of the commission of the arrest and the chief officer of the employing law enforcement agency or their designee within twenty-four (24) hours of the time the arrest was made, as contained in the arrest report.

The chief officer, or the chief officer's designee, of the law enforcement agency employing the officer at the time of the arrest shall notify the executive secretary of the commission of the arrest within twenty-four (24) hours of gaining knowledge of the arrest.

The commission may revoke or suspend the certification, withhold a pay supplement pursuant to § 38-8-111(e)(2), or take any other lawful action against an officer certified under this part who is arrested for any offense and knowingly fails to notify the executive secretary of the commission of the arrest within the time period prescribed in subdivision (a)(1).

Acts 2017, ch. 301, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 301, § 4. July 1, 2017.